Utah statutes.
63J-8-105.7.   Green River Energy Zone established -- Findings -- Management and land use priorities.

(1)  There is established the Green River Energy Zone in Carbon and Emery Counties for the purpose of maximizing efficient and responsible development of energy and mineral resources.

(2)  The land area and boundaries of the Green River Energy Zone are described in 63J-8-102(9) and illustrated on the maps described in Section 63J-8-105.

(3)  The state finds that:

(a)  the lands comprising the Green River Energy Zone contain abundant world-class deposits of energy and mineral resources, including oil, natural gas, oil shale, oil sands, gilsonite, coal, phosphate, gold, uranium, and copper, as well as areas with high wind and solar energy potential;

(b)  for lands within the Carbon County portion of the Green River Energy Zone, the highest management priority is the responsible management, development, and extraction of existing energy and mineral resources in order to provide long-term domestic energy and supplies for Utah and the United States; and

(c)  for lands within the Emery County portion of the Green River Energy Zone:

(i)  the responsible management and development of existing energy and mineral resources in order to provide long-term domestic energy and supplies for Utah and the United States is a high management priority; and

(ii)  the management priority described in Subsection (3)(c)(i) should be balanced with the following high management priorities:

(A)  watershed health;

(B)  water storage and water delivery systems;

(C)  Emery County Heritage Sites;

(D)  facilities and resources associated with the domestic livestock industry;

(E)  wildlife and wildlife habitat; and

(F)  recreation opportunities.

(4)  The state supports:

(a)  efficient and responsible full development of all existing energy and mineral resources located within the Green River Energy Zone, including oil, oil shale, natural gas, oil sands, gilsonite, coal, phosphate, gold, uranium, copper, solar, and wind resources; and

(b)  a cooperative management approach by federal agencies, the state of Utah, and local governments to achieve broadly supported management plans for the full development of all energy and mineral resources within the Green River Energy Zone.

(5)  The state requests that the federal agencies that administer lands within the Green River Energy Zone:

(a)  fully cooperate and coordinate with the state of Utah and with Carbon and Emery Counties to develop, amend, and implement land and resource management plans and to implement management decisions that are consistent with the purposes, goals, and policies described in this section to the maximum extent allowed under federal law;

(b)  expedite the processing, granting, and streamlining of mineral and energy leases and applications to drill, extract, and otherwise develop all existing energy and mineral resources located within the Green River Energy Zone, including oil, natural gas, oil shale, oil sands, gilsonite, coal, phosphate, gold, uranium, copper, solar, and wind resources;

(c)  allow continued maintenance and increased development of roads, power lines, pipeline infrastructure, and other utilities necessary to achieve the goals, purposes, and policies described in this section;

(d)  refrain from any planning decisions and management actions that will undermine, restrict, or diminish the goals, purposes, and policies for the Green River Energy Zone as stated in this section; and

(e)  refrain from implementing a policy that is contrary to the goals and purposes within this section.

(6)  The state calls upon Congress to establish an intergovernmental standing commission, with membership consisting of representatives from the United States government, the state of Utah, and local governments to guide and control planning and management actions in the Green River Energy Zone in order to achieve and maintain the goals, purposes, and policies described in this section.

(7)  Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the state's grazing and livestock policies and plans on land within the Green River Energy Zone shall continue to be governed by Sections 63J-4-401 and 63J-8-104.



Enacted by Chapter 472, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 472, 2013 General Session, (Coordination Clause)

